Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-106 Record of investments. (a)
As to each investment or loan of the funds of a domestic insurer, a written
record in permanent form showing the authorization thereof shall be made and
signed by an officer of the insurer or by the chairperson of the committee
authorizing the investment or loan.

(b) Investment records which document the
security transactions are to be maintained in the insurer's principal office in
this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next